South Dakota, session 2026, HB1294.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That a NEW SECTION be added to chapter 34A-1:
No person may engage in geoengineering experimentation in this state.
A violation of this section is a Class 6 felony.
For purposes of this section, "geoengineering" means the an intentional, large-
scale
intervention in the earth’s climate system to counteract climate change by:
(1) Removing carbon dioxide from the atmosphere; or
(2) Reflecting sunlight away from earth alteration or manipulation of the
environment, typically involving the release of aerosols, chemicals, chemical compounds,
electromagnetic radiation, or other physical agents, which increase air pollution and effect
changes to the earth's atmosphere or surface, including solar radiation modification,
sunlight reflection methods, climate intervention, stratospheric aerosol injection, cirrus
cloud thinning, cloud seeding, and carbon capture and storage.
The term does not include natural conservation activities designed to preserve or
restore forests, wetlands, grasslands, and other existing ecosystems.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.